lexc/num/enhunum1.lexc
LEXICON Casea
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Casea1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Szora
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Suba;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;
LEXICON Suba
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

! három:hárm
LEXICON AddNumhar
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Posshar;
+Num:0     Plurhar;

LEXICON Posshar
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famhar;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famhar;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JPnull§§AE1§   Famhar;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famhar;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^ónk   Famhar;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famhar;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^ót§OEOE§k   Famhar;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JPnull§§UUE1§k   Famhar;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^ój§UUE1§k   Famhar;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Famhar;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Famhar;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Famhar;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Famhar;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famhar;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Famhar;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                       Casehar1;
!                       Case1har;

LEXICON Plurhar
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genhar;
                       Casehar1;
!                       Case1har;

LEXICON Famhar
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genhar;
                       Genhar;
!                       Case1har;

LEXICON Genhar
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casehar;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casehar;
                       Casehar1;
 
LEXICON Casehar
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                            #;
LEXICON Casehar1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

!LEXICON Case1har
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n


LEXICON AddNummar
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possmar;
+Num:0     Plurmar;
+Num:0     Fammar;

LEXICON Possmar
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Submar;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fammar;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fammar;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fammar;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fammar;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fammar;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fammar;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fammar;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fammar;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fammar;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fammar;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fammar;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fammar;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammar1;

LEXICON Plurmar
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genmar;
                            Genmar;
        
LEXICON Fammar
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmar;
                       Genmar;
LEXICON Fammar1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmar;
                       Genmar1;

LEXICON Genmar
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemar;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemar;
                       Casemar;
LEXICON Genmar1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemar;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemar;
                       Casemar1;
 

LEXICON Num
kettő AddNummar; 
három:hárm AddNumhar; 
